tests/data/oci-pgen.dix
<pardef n="contraccioenta">
	<e>
		<p>
		  <l><b/><a/>eth</l>
		  <r>ath<b/></r>
	   </p>
		<par n="no_contrac"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
		  <l><b/><a/>eth<b/></l>
		  <r>ath<b/></r>
	  </p>
		<par n="no_contrac"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>eth<b/><a/></l>
			<r>ath<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="no_contrac"/>
	</e>
 		<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>eth<b/></l>
			<r>ad<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>eth<b/><a/></l>
			<r>ad<b/><a/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>eth</l>
			<r>ad<b/>eth</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>es</l>
			<r>às</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>era</l>
			<r>ara</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/></l>
			<r>ad<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>à<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	
</pardef>


<pardef n="un">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>un</l>
			<r>un</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>ua</l>
			<r>ua</r>
		</p>
	</e>
 </pardef>
 


<pardef n="pronoms_aprost_oc">
 <e>
	 <p>
		 <l/>
		 <r>'</r>
	 </p>
	 <par n="vocal_general"/>
 </e>
 <e>
	 <p>
		 <l/>
		 <r>e<b/></r>
	 </p>
 </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="det_simple">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>la<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>lo<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detlas<b/></l>
			<r>las<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detlos<b/></l>
			<r>los<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detla</l>
			<r>la</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detlo</l>
			<r>lo</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detlas</l>
			<r>las</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detlos</l>
			<r>los</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prneth_simple">
	<e>
		<par n="quotes_empty"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>prnera</l>
			<r>era</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="quotes_empty"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>prneth</l>
			<r>eth</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="quotes_empty"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>prneras</l>
			<r>eras</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="quotes_empty"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>prneths</l>
			<r>eths</r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vers_detlo_oci">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>vèrs<b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>vèl<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>vèrs<b/><a/>detlos<b/></l>
			<r>vèls<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>vèrs<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>vèrs<b/>la<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>vèrs<b/><a/>detlas<b/></l>
			<r>vèrs<b/>las<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>vèrs<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>vèrs<b/>l'<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>vèrs<b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>vèrs<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>vèrs<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>vèrs<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>vèrs<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>vèrs<b/>se</r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ta_detlo_gascon">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>tà<b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>tau<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>tà<b/><a/>detlos<b/></l>
			<r>taus<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>tà<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>tà<b/>la<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>tà<b/><a/>detlas<b/></l>
			<r>tà<b/>las<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>tà<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>tà<b/>l'<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>tà<b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>tà<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>tà<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>tà<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>tà<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>tà<b/>se</r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="enta_detlo_gascon">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>entà<b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>entau<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>entà<b/><a/>detlos<b/></l>
			<r>entaus<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>entà<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>entà<b/>la<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>entà<b/><a/>detlas<b/></l>
			<r>entà<b/>las<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>entà<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>entà<b/>l'<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>entà<b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>entà<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>entà<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>entà<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>entà<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>entà<b/>se</r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ende_detlo_gascon">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ende<b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>endeu<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ende<b/><a/>detlos<b/></l>
			<r>endeus<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ende<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>ende<b/>la<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ende<b/><a/>detlas<b/></l>
			<r>ende<b/>las<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ende<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>ende<b/>l'<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ende<b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>ende<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ende<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>ende<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ende<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>ende<b/>se</r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dambe_detlo_gascon">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>dambe<b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>dambeu<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>dambe<b/><a/>detlos<b/></l>
			<r>dambeus<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>dambe<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>dambe<b/>la<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>dambe<b/><a/>detlas<b/></l>
			<r>dambe<b/>las<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>dambe<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>dambe<b/>l'<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>dambe<b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>dambe<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>dambe<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>dambe<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>dambe<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>dambe<b/>se</r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>

</pardefs>

	<e>
		<p>
		<l><a/>cada</l>
		<r>cad</r>
		</p>
		<par n="un"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="prneth_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>que<b/></l>
			<r>qu'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="prneth_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>n'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="prneth_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>sus<b/></l>
			<r>sus<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="prneth_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>jos<b/></l>
			<r>jos<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="prneth_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="ende_detlo_gascon"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="dambe_detlo_gascon"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="vers_detlo_oci"/>
	</e>
